Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-132
Public property; exempt from lien.

Notwithstanding the provisions on existence of a construction lien of section 52-131, no lien attaches under sections 52-125 to 52-159 to real estate owned by the state, a county, a municipality, or other governmental agency or political subdivision.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 8.